Hawaii, session 2026, GM1235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 88-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows:
"(e) Commencing with fiscal year 2005-2006 and each
subsequent fiscal year until fiscal year 2007-2008, the employer
contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of
the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on
fifteen and three-fourths per cent of the member's compensation
for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and
thirteen and three-fourths per cent of the member's compensation
for all other employees. Commencing with fiscal year 2008-2009
and each subsequent fiscal year until fiscal year 2011-2012, the
employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for
each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be
based on nineteen and seven-tenths per cent of the member's
compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections
officers and fifteen per cent of the member's compensation for
2026-2363 SB3096 CDl SMA.docx 1
iniiiiininiMiiiHHiiii

Page 2 3096
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
all other employees. In fiscal year 2012-2013, the employer
contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of
the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on
twenty-two per cent of the member's compensation for police
officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and fifteen and
one-half per cent of the member's compensation for all other
employees. In fiscal year 2013-2014, the employer contributions
for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups
of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-three
per cent of the member's compensation for police officers,
firefighters, and corrections officers and sixteen per cent of
the member's compensation for all other employees. In fiscal
year 2014-2015, the employer contributions for normal cost and
accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in
subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-four per cent of the
member’s compensation for police officers, firefighters, and
corrections officers and sixteen and one-half per cent of the
member's compensation for all other employees. Commencing with
fiscal year 2015-2016 until fiscal year 2016-2017, the employer
contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of
the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on
2026-2363 SB3096 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiMiiiiniiii

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
twenty-five per cent of the member's compensation for police
officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and seventeen
per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.
In fiscal year 2017-2018, the employer contributions for normal
cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of
employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-eight per
cent of the member's compensation for police officers,
firefighters, and corrections officers and eighteen per cent of
the member's compensation for all other employees. In fiscal
year 2018-2019, the employer contributions for normal cost and
accrued liability for each of the two groups in subsection (a)
shall be based on thirty-one per cent of the member's
compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections
officers and nineteen per cent of the member's compensation for
all other employees. In fiscal year 2019-2020, the employer
contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of
the two groups in subsection (a) shall be based on thirty-six
per cent of the member's compensation for police officers,
firefighters, and corrections officers and twenty-two per cent
of the member's compensation for all other employees.
Commencing with fiscal year 2020-2021 and each subsequent fiscal
2026-2363 SB3096 CDl SMA.docx

Page 4
S.B. NO. sr,
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
year [7-] until fiscal year 2026-2027, the employer contributions
for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups
in subsection (a) shall be based on forty-one per cent of the
member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and
corrections officers and twenty-four per cent of the member's
compensation for all other employees. Commencing with fiscal
year 2027-2028 and each subsequent fiscal year, the employer
contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of
the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on
forty-four per cent of the member's compensation for police
officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and twenty-four
per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.
The contribution rates shall amortize the total unfunded accrued
liability of the entire plan over a period not to exceed the
maximum funding period.
*
The contribution rates shall be subject to adjustment:
(1) If the actual period required to amortize the unfunded
accrued liability exceeds the maximum funding period;
(2) If there is no unfunded accrued liability; or
(3) Based on the actuarial investigation conducted in
accordance with section 88-105."
2026-2363 SB3096 CDl SMA.docx 4
nHIIIHIIIHIIIIllllill

Page 5
S.B. NO. S?,
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
2026-2363 SB3096 CDl SMA.docx 5
miiiifliiiiiiiniiiHiiiiii

S.B. NO. SS’i
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3096, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
96-26

SB No. 3096, SD 1, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives